Colorado, session 2026A, HB1018.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-6-315 as
follows:
25.5-6-315. Long-term services and supports for nursing
facility residents - discharge planning - presumptive eligibility -
reporting - definition.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "PRESUMPTIVE ELIGIBILITY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 25.5-5-204.
(2) (a) IF THE STATE DEPARTMENT RECEIVES FEDERAL
AUTHORIZATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-5-204 (2.7) AND, AS
NECESSARY, SUBSECTION (15) OF THIS SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL BEING
DISCHARGED FROM A NURSING FACILITY IS PRESUMPTIVELY ELIGIBLE FOR
THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 6 AND
ARTICLES 4 AND 5 OF THIS TITLE 25.5 TO RECEIVE LONG-TERM SERVICES
AND SUPPORTS, INCLUDING HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES,
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 6 IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
-2- HB26-1018

(I) IS FUNCTIONALLY ELIGIBLE FOR LONG-TERM SERVICES AND
SUPPORTS PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 6; AND
(II) ATTESTS TO INFORMATION THAT MEETS THE INCOME, ASSETS,
AND IMMIGRATION ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR THE MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(b) THE ATTESTATION REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2)(a)(II) OF THIS
SECTION MUST BE MADE TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT IN THE MANNER
PRESCRIBED BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT AT THE TIME OF THE FUNCTIONAL
ELIGIBILITY ASSESSMENT REQUIRED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) A NURSING FACILITY SHALL NOTIFY THE STATE DEPARTMENT
WITHIN THREE BUSINESS DAYS OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ELIGIBLE TO
TRANSITION OUT OF A NURSING FACILITY AFTER DETERMINING THE
INDIVIDUAL'S ELIGIBILITY TO TRANSITION OUT OF THE NURSING FACILITY.
(4) (a) THE STATE DEPARTMENT MUST ASSESS AN INDIVIDUAL
BEING DISCHARGED FROM A NURSING FACILITY TO DETERMINE WHETHER
THE INDIVIDUAL IS FUNCTIONALLY ELIGIBLE FOR LONG-TERM SERVICES
AND SUPPORTS PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 6 WITHIN ONE BUSINESS DAY
AFTER RECEIVING NOTIFICATION THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS ELIGIBLE TO
TRANSITION OUT OF A NURSING FACILITY. A FUNCTIONAL ELIGIBILITY
DETERMINATION MUST BE MADE BEFORE HOUSING IS SECURED FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
(b) IF THE STATE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT AN INDIVIDUAL
IS FUNCTIONALLY ELIGIBLE FOR LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 6 AND SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
AND THE INDIVIDUAL COMPLETED THE ATTESTATION REQUIRED IN
SUBSECTION (2)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL
DETERMINE THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS PRESUMPTIVELY ELIGIBLE TO
-3- HB26-1018

RECEIVE LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION. THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE COUNTY
DEPARTMENT THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS PRESUMPTIVELY ELIGIBLE.
(c) UPON RECEIPT OF THE PRESUMPTIVE ELIGIBILITY
DETERMINATION MADE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(b) OF THIS SECTION
AND WITHIN THREE BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE NOTIFICATION,
THE COUNTY DEPARTMENT MUST ENROLL THE INDIVIDUAL IN LONG-TERM
SERVICES AND SUPPORTS THAT MEET THE INDIVIDUAL'S NEEDS. THE
COUNTY DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT ENGAGE IN A FINANCIAL ELIGIBILITY
DETERMINATION FOR THE INDIVIDUAL.
(5) THE INDIVIDUAL OR THE INDIVIDUAL'S LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE
MUST SUBMIT AN APPLICATION FOR LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT WITHIN TEN CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE
PRESUMPTIVE ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATION.
(6) IF AN INDIVIDUAL BEING DISCHARGED FROM A NURSING
FACILITY IS DETERMINED TO BE PRESUMPTIVELY ELIGIBLE FOR SERVICES
THROUGH A LONG-TERM CARE PROGRAM PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 6,
ANY PRIOR AUTHORIZATION REQUIRED FOR A SERVICE PROVIDER TO BILL
FOR HOME HEALTH SERVICES RENDERED TO THE INDIVIDUAL MUST BE
APPROVED BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT, AND THE NECESSARY SERVICES
MUST BE IN PLACE PRIOR TO THE INDIVIDUAL'S DATE OF DISCHARGE FROM
THE NURSING FACILITY.
(7) AFTER PRESUMPTIVE ELIGIBILITY IS DETERMINED FOR AN
INDIVIDUAL, THE NURSING FACILITY MUST WORK WITH ALL APPROPRIATE
ENTITIES TO ENSURE THE LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL REQUIRES ARE IN PLACE PRIOR TO THE INDIVIDUAL'S DATE OF
DISCHARGE FROM THE NURSING FACILITY.
-4- HB26-1018

(8) THE PRESUMPTIVE ELIGIBILITY PERIOD BEGINS ON THE DATE
THE INDIVIDUAL IS DETERMINED FUNCTIONALLY ELIGIBLE FOR LONG-TERM
SERVICES AND SUPPORTS PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 6 AND SUBSECTION
(4)(a) OF THIS SECTION AND ENDS ON THE LATER OF:
(a) THE LAST DAY OF THE MONTH FOLLOWING THE MONTH OF THE
PRESUMPTIVE ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATION IF A LONG-TERM SERVICE AND
SUPPORT APPLICATION IS NOT COMPLETED AND SUBMITTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION WITHIN TEN CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE
PRESUMPTIVE ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATION; OR
(b) THE LAST DAY OF THE MONTH THAT FINAL ELIGIBILITY
DETERMINATION IS MADE IF A LONG-TERM SERVICE AND SUPPORT
APPLICATION IS SUBMITTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS
SECTION WITHIN TEN CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE PRESUMPTIVE
ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATION.
(9) IF IT IS DETERMINED THAT AN INDIVIDUAL IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR
MEDICAL BENEFITS AFTER THE INDIVIDUAL WAS DETERMINED TO BE
ELIGIBLE FOR SERVICES THROUGH A LONG-TERM CARE PROGRAM
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 6 BASED ON PRESUMPTIVE ELIGIBILITY, THE
STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT PURSUE RECOVERY FROM A COUNTY
DEPARTMENT FOR THE COST OF MEDICAL SERVICES PROVIDED TO THE
INDIVIDUAL. THE COUNTY DEPARTMENT IS NOT RESPONSIBLE FOR ANY
FEDERAL ERROR RATE SANCTIONS RESULTING FROM THE DETERMINATION.
(10) REDETERMINATION OF ELIGIBILITY FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
MUST TAKE PLACE ANNUALLY ON THE DATE THE MEMBER WAS INITIALLY
ENROLLED IN THE STATE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(11) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, AND EACH JANUARY 1
THEREAFTER, THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE
-5- HB26-1018

STATE AUDITOR AND POST THE REPORT ON THE STATE DEPARTMENT'S
WEBSITE DETAILING THE FOLLOWING FOR THE PREVIOUS CALENDAR YEAR:
(a) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS DISCHARGED FROM A NURSING
FACILITY WHO WERE DETERMINED TO BE PRESUMPTIVELY ELIGIBLE FOR
LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS AS DESCRIBED IN THE STATE
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE
6 AND ARTICLES 4 AND 5 OF THIS TITLE 25.5;
(b) HOW LONG IT TOOK FOR EACH PRESUMPTIVE ELIGIBILITY
DETERMINATION TO BE MADE;
(c) HOW LONG IT TOOK TO DETERMINE FUNCTIONAL ELIGIBILITY
AND FINANCIAL ELIGIBILITY FOR EACH INDIVIDUAL;
(d) FOR EACH INDIVIDUAL, THE NUMBER OF DAYS BETWEEN WHEN
THE STATE DEPARTMENT NOTIFIED THE COUNTY DEPARTMENT THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL WAS FUNCTIONALLY ELIGIBLE FOR LONG-TERM SERVICES AND
SUPPORTS AND WHEN THE COUNTY DEPARTMENT ENROLLED THE
INDIVIDUAL IN LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS;
(e) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS WHO WERE DETERMINED TO BE
PRESUMPTIVELY ELIGIBLE FOR LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS AND
DISCHARGED FROM A NURSING FACILITY WITHOUT LONG-TERM SERVICES
AND SUPPORTS IN PLACE AND THE REASON THAT THE NECESSARY SERVICES
AND SUPPORTS WERE NOT IN PLACE AT THE TIME OF THE INDIVIDUAL'S
DISCHARGE FROM THE NURSING FACILITY; AND
(f) A LIST OF LOCAL SUPPORT AGENCIES, INCLUDING ANY OF THE
STATE-CONTRACTED INDEPENDENT LIVING CENTERS, AREA AGENCY ON
AGING CENTERS, OR OTHER COMMUNITY SUPPORT AGENCIES, THAT
PROVIDE SERVICES TO THE ELDERLY, BLIND, OR DISABLED COMMUNITY.
(12) UPON RECEIPT OF THE REPORT SUBMITTED PURSUANT TO
-6- HB26-1018

SUBSECTION (11) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE AUDITOR MAY CONDUCT AN
AUDIT OF THE STATE DEPARTMENT FOR ANY DELAY DETAILED IN THE
REPORT THAT RESULTED IN AN INDIVIDUAL BEING DISCHARGED FROM A
NURSING FACILITY WITHOUT LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS IN
PLACE.
(13) IF A COUNTY DEPARTMENT FAILS THREE TIMES WITHIN A
CALENDAR YEAR TO ENROLL AN INDIVIDUAL IN LONG-TERM SERVICES AND
SUPPORTS WITHIN THREE BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING NOTIFICATION
FROM THE STATE DEPARTMENT AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (3)(c) OF
THIS SECTION, THE STATE DEPARTMENT MAY TRANSFER THE
RESPONSIBILITY TO ANOTHER AGENCY OR VENDOR.
(14) (a) IF A NURSING FACILITY FAILS TO DISCHARGE AN
INDIVIDUAL ON THE DATE OF DISCHARGE DUE TO A FAILURE WITHIN THE
NURSING FACILITY'S CONTROL OR FAILS TO COOPERATE IN GOOD FAITH
WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT TO ENSURE LONG-TERM CARE SERVICES
AND SUPPORTS ARE IN PLACE FOR THE INDIVIDUAL ON THE INDIVIDUAL'S
DATE OF DISCHARGE, THE STATE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE A BILLING
PENALTY RESULTING IN THE NURSING FACILITY'S INABILITY TO BILL THE
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM FOR UP TO A MAXIMUM OF SEVEN
CALENDAR DAYS FOR THE SERVICES RENDERED AS A RESULT OF THE
DELAY.
(b) THE PENALTY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (14)(a) OF THIS
SECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF THE DELAY WAS THE RESULT OF FACTORS
BEYOND THE NURSING FACILITY'S CONTROL.
(15) THE STATE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED TO SEEK FEDERAL
AUTHORIZATION TO ALLOW A NURSING FACILITY RESIDENT WHO REQUIRES
SERVICES THROUGH A LONG-TERM CARE PROGRAM PURSUANT TO THIS
-7- HB26-1018

ARTICLE 6 UPON DISCHARGE FROM A NURSING FACILITY TO BE
PRESUMPTIVELY ELIGIBLE FOR LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS AS
DESCRIBED IN THE STATE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 6 AND ARTICLES 4 AND 5 OF THIS TITLE 25.5.
IF FEDERAL AUTHORIZATION IS NEEDED TO IMPLEMENT THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, THIS SECTION DOES NOT TAKE EFFECT
UNTIL FEDERAL AUTHORIZATION IS APPROVED.
(16) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE ANY NECESSARY
CHANGES TO THE STATE PLAN WAIVERS FOR HOME- AND
COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICE PROGRAMS AND ANY OTHER FEDERAL
AUTHORIZATIONS THAT ARE AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 6 TO
COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION.
(17) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS SECTION USING EXISTING RESOURCES OF THE STATE DEPARTMENT.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-8- HB26-1018